Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
PART 4 Meat Processors and Related Industries

Cross references.

Regulation of business of rendering and disposal plants, §

4-4-40

et seq.

26-2-130.
Buying, selling, transporting, or receiving of dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals.

No person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of buying, selling, or transporting in commerce dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals, or any parts of the carcasses of any such animals, shall buy, sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, or other equines, or parts of the carcasses of any such animals, unless such transaction or transportation is made in accordance with such regulations as the Commissioner may promulgate, to assure that such animals, or the unwholesome parts or products thereof, will be prevented from being used for human food purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 19; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 26; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 15; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 22/SB 364.

Cross references.

Disposal of carcasses of animals which die on premises of public livestock sales markets, livestock slaughter establishments, and garbage feeding operations, §

4-5-7

.

26-2-131.
Registration of dealers in dead, dying, diseased, or disabled animals.

No person, firm, or corporation shall engage in business as a meat broker, renderer, or animal food manufacturer or engage in business as a wholesaler of any carcasses, or parts or products of the carcasses, of any cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, or other equines, whether intended for human food or other purposes, or engage in business as a public warehouseman storing any such articles, or engage in the business of buying, selling, or transporting in commerce any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals of the specified kinds, or parts of such carcasses of any such animals unless, when required by regulations of the Commissioner, he or she has registered with the Commissioner his or her name and the address of each place of business at which, and all trade names under which, he or she conducts such business.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 18; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 27; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 16; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 23/SB 364.

26-2-132.
Maintenance and inspection of records.

The following classes of persons, firms, and corporations shall keep such records as will fully and correctly disclose all transactions involved in their businesses; and all persons, firms, and corporations subject to such requirements shall, at all reasonable times, upon notice by a duly authorized representative of the Commissioner, afford such representative and any duly authorized representative of the secretary of agriculture of the United States accompanied by such representative of the Commissioner access to their places of business and opportunity to examine the facilities, inventory, and records thereof, to copy all such records, and to take reasonable samples of their inventory upon payment of the fair market value therefor:

Any persons, firms, or corporations that engage for commerce in the business of slaughtering any cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, or other equines or preparing, freezing, packaging, or labeling any carcasses, or parts or products of carcasses, of any such animals for use as human food or animal food;

Any persons, firms, or corporations that engage in the business of buying or selling (as meat brokers, wholesalers, or otherwise) or transporting in commerce or storing in or for such commerce any carcasses, or parts or products of carcasses, of any such animals; and

Any persons, firms, or corporations that engage in business as renderers or engage in the business of buying, selling, or transporting any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, or other equines, or parts of such carcasses.

Any record required to be maintained by this Code section shall be maintained for such period of time as the Commissioner may by regulations prescribe.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 17; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 28; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 17; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 24/SB 364.

26-2-133.
Identification of carcasses, meat, or meat food products not intended for human use.

No person, firm, or corporation shall buy, sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation any animal, carcasses, or parts thereof, meat, or meat food products of any such animals, which are not intended for use as human food unless they are denatured or otherwise identified as required by the regulations of the Commissioner or are naturally inedible by humans.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 16.